California statutes. Corporations Code
If no stop order or orders under subdivision (a) of Section 25143 are in effect under this law, qualification of the sale of securities under this subdivision automatically becomes effective (and the securities may be offered and sold in accordance with the terms of the application) upon the day following the expiration of its prior qualification pursuant to this section or, if that qualification has expired, upon the first business day following the filing of the application pursuant to this subdivision. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall restrict the authority of the commissioner pursuant to Section 25140 or 25143.

(2) A unit investment trust that has not previously applied to qualify the sale of its securities pursuant to this section but that is substantially the same as one or more unit investment trusts previously qualified under this section by the same sponsor, shall file pursuant to this subdivision if it can make the statements specified below. An application filed pursuant to this subdivision shall contain the following information and be accompanied by the following documents, in addition to the information specified in Section 25160 and the consent to service of process required by Section 25165: (A) a statement that the applicant, in its organization, its plan of business, its securities and its offering, is substantially the same as a unit investment trust previously qualified under this section by the same sponsor; (B) a statement that those previously qualified unit investment trusts are in compliance with the terms of their qualifications and (C) a copy of its current registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933. If no stop order or orders under subdivision (a) of Section 25143 are in effect under this law, qualification of the sale of securities under this subdivision automatically becomes effective (and the security may be offered and sold in accordance with the terms of the application) at the moment the federal registration becomes effective or, if the registration is effective when the application is filed, upon the first business day following the filing of the application pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 41, Sec. 3.   Effective May 6, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25112.

(a) Any security issued by a person which is the issuer of any security registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or issued, by an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, and which is not eligible for qualification under Section 25111, may be qualified by notification under this section.

(b) An application for qualification under this section shall contain such information and be accompanied by such documents as shall be required by rule of the commissioner, in addition to the information specified in Section 25160 and the consent to service of process required by Section 25165. For this purpose, the commissioner may classify issuers and types of securities.

(c) If no stop order or order under subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect under this law, qualification of the sale of the securities under this section automatically becomes effective (and the securities may be offered and sold in accordance with the terms of the application as amended) at 12 o’clock noon California time of the 10th business day after the filing of the application or the last amendment thereto or at such earlier time as the commissioner determines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25113.

(a) All securities, whether or not eligible for qualification by coordination under Section 25111 or qualification by notification under Section 25112, may be qualified by permit under this section.

(b) (1) An application for a permit under this section shall contain any information and be accompanied by any documents as shall be required by rule of the commissioner, in addition to the information specified in Section 25160 and the consent to service of process required by Section 25165. For this purpose, the commissioner may classify issuers and types of securities.

(2) An applicant may file a small company application for permit under
 this section if it meets all of the following conditions:

(A) The applicant is: (i) a California corporation or a foreign corporation, which at the time of filing an application under this subdivision is subject to Section 2115, and neither corporation is a “blind pool” company, as that term is defined by the commissioner; (ii) not engaged in oil and gas exploration or production, or mining or other extractive industries; (iii) not an investment company subject to the Investment Company Act of 1940; and (iv) not subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.

(B) The total offering of voting common stock and preferred stock by the applicant to be sold in a 12-month period, within or outside this state, is limited to one million dollars ($1,000,000), less the aggregate offering price for all securities sold (within the 12 months
 before the start, and during the offering, of the voting common stock or preferred stock) under Rule 504 of the Securities and Exchange Commission, in reliance on any exemption under subdivision (b) of Section 3 of the Securities Act of 1933, or in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 5 of that act, and immediately after the proposed sale and issuance there will be only one class of voting common stock.

(C) The minimum offering price of the voting common stock and preferred stock (and the conversion price if the preferred stock is convertible into the voting common stock) to be sold is two dollars ($2) per share and the applicant files an undertaking with the commissioner that there will be no stock splits, stock dividends, spinoffs, or mergers for a period of two years from the close of the offering. The undertaking notwithstanding, the commissioner may approve a spinoff or merger pursuant to an application for qualification filed by an
 applicant.

(D) The net proceeds from the offering are to be expended in the operations of the business.

(E) The offering is made pursuant to a Small Corporate Offering Registration disclosure document based on the Form U-7 as adopted by the North American Securities Administrators Association and any additional requirements as the commissioner shall prescribe, that may include, but not be limited to, investor suitability and due diligence investigation requirements.

(F) The application and disclosure document is reviewed and signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors of the applicant.

(G) The application shall contain that information and be accompanied by those documents required by rule of the commissioner, in addition to the
 information specified in Section 25610 and the consent to service of process required by Section 25165.

(c) Qualification of securities under this section becomes effective upon the commissioner issuing a permit authorizing the issuance of those securities.

(d) The commissioner shall annually prepare a report, and make that report publicly available by posting the report on the department’s Internet Web site, summarizing data collected from persons to which it issues permits pursuant to this section. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a summary of the general categories of investments for which permits are approved; the minimum, maximum, and average net worth required of those persons
 to whom permits are issued for each category of activity; the least stringent and most stringent suitability standards imposed on persons issued permits for each category of activity; the experience requirements imposed on persons issued permits for each category of activity; the total dollar amount of money sought to be raised per category of activity; the number and nature of enforcement actions taken against permitholders; and any other information the commissioner deems relevant to inform the Legislature about the activities of permitholders and the protections for those who invest with permitholders. The commissioner shall take steps to ensure that the publication of data collected from permitholders does not result in the release of proprietary information about individuals or businesses.

(e) The commissioner may examine those persons to whom permits are issued pursuant to this section to review compliance with the conditions of the permit and other applicable state law. The commissioner may disqualify an offering permitted pursuant to this section if he or she finds that the issuer has materially violated the provisions of its permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 669, Sec. 6.   (SB 978)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25114.

Every qualification under this chapter is effective for 12 months from its effective date, unless the commissioner by order or rule specifies a different period, except during the time an order under Section 25140 or subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25115.

Every application for qualification of an issuer transaction under this chapter shall be signed and verified by the issuer; every application for qualification of a nonissuer transaction under Section 25111 shall be signed and verified by the person on whose behalf the offering is being made or by the issuer on behalf of such person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

25116.

(a) An evidence of indebtedness issued pursuant to a qualification under this chapter or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25120), and the purchasers or holders thereof, shall be exempt from the usury provisions of the Constitution, subject to compliance by the issuer and purchaser with the terms and requirements that may be imposed by the commissioner as a condition of the qualification. This section creates and authorizes a class of transactions and persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution.

(b) Any evidence of indebtedness issued in compliance with this section shall be entitled to the benefits of the usury exemption contained in this section regardless of whether subsequent to its issuance the evidence of indebtedness is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be a “security.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 477, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

25117.

(a) An evidence of indebtedness, and the purchasers or holders thereof, shall be exempt from the usury provisions of Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution if (1) the evidence of indebtedness is rated or provisionally rated by Standard & Poor’s Corporation as AAA, AA, A, BBB, or investment grade commercial paper, or by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. as Aaa, Aa, A, Baa, or investment grade commercial paper, including any such ratings with “+” or “—” designation or other variations that occur within these ratings, or has a rating or a provisional rating by another nationally recognized rating agency or system, which rating and agency or system have been certified by rule or order of the commissioner, or (2) the issuer thereof either (A) has any security listed or
 approved for listing upon notice of issuance on a national securities exchange, if the exchange has been certified by the commissioner, pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 25100, or (B) meets each of the following requirements:

(i) The issuer is a corporation which is subject to Section 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.

(ii) The issuer had total shareholders’ equity of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) at the end of its most recent fiscal year, and had consolidated net income, after all charges, including taxes and extraordinary losses, and excluding extraordinary gains, of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for three of its last four fiscal years, including its most recent fiscal year. The determination of total shareholders’ equity and net income shall be determined in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applicable to that
 fiscal year or years, on a consolidated basis, or (3) the evidence of indebtedness is issued by any corporation all of the outstanding shares of which are owned by an issuer which meets the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2).

(b) This section creates and authorizes a class of transactions and persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(c) Any evidence of indebtedness issued in compliance with this section shall be entitled to the benefits of the usury exemption contained in this section regardless of whether subsequent to its issuance the evidence of indebtedness is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be a “security.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 131, Sec. 11.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25118.

(a) An evidence of indebtedness issued by an entity or guaranteed by an entity that is an affiliate (as defined in Section 150) of the borrower that, on the day the evidence of indebtedness issued or guaranty is first issued or entered into, has total assets of at least two million dollars ($2,000,000) according to its then most recent financial statements, and the purchasers or holders thereof, shall be exempt from the usury provisions of the California Constitution. The financial statements referred to in the preceding sentence shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) Be as of a date not more than 90 days before the date the evidence of indebtedness or guaranty is first issued or entered into.

(2) Be prepared in accordance with either of the following:

(A) In accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and, if the entity has consolidated subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis.

(B) In accordance with the rules and requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission, whether or not required by law to be prepared in accordance with those rules and requirements.

(b) Any one or more evidences of indebtedness, and the purchasers or holders thereof, shall be exempt from the usury provisions of the California Constitution if either of the following applies:

(1) The evidences of indebtedness aggregate at the time of issuance at least three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000)
 in original face amount, or, if the evidences of indebtedness are purchased with original issue discount, they are purchased for an aggregate purchase price at the time of issuance of at least three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).

(2) The evidences of indebtedness are issued pursuant to a bona fide written commitment for the lending to the issuer of at least three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000), or the provision of a line of credit to the issuer in a principal amount of at least three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000). The exemption provided by this paragraph shall not be affected by a subsequent event of default or other event not in the lender’s control that has relieved or may relieve the lender from its commitment.

(c) Any evidence of indebtedness described in subdivision (a) or (b), and the purchasers or holders thereof, shall be entitled to the benefits of the
 usury exemption contained in this section regardless of whether, at any time after the evidence of indebtedness or guaranty upon which the exemption is based is first issued or entered into, the evidence of indebtedness or guaranty is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction not to be a “security.”

(d) This section creates and authorizes a class of transactions and persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(e) This section does not apply to:

(1) Any evidence of indebtedness issued or guaranteed (if the guaranty is part of the consideration for the indebtedness) by an individual, a revocable trust having one or more individuals as trustors, or a partnership in which, at the time of issuance, one or more individuals are general partners.

(2) Any transaction subject to the limitation on permissible rates of interest set forth in paragraph (1) of the first sentence of Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(f) The exemptions created by this section shall only be available in a transaction that meets either of the following criteria:

(1) The lender and either the issuer of the indebtedness or the guarantor, as the case may be, or any of their respective officers, directors, or controlling persons, or, if any party is a limited liability company, the managers as appointed or elected by the members, have a preexisting personal or business relationship.

(2) The lender and the issuer, or the lender and the guarantor, by reason of their own business and financial experience or
 that of their professional advisers, could reasonably be assumed to have the capacity to protect their own interests in connection with the transaction.

(g) For purposes of this section, “preexisting personal or business relationship” and “capacity to protect their own interests in connection with the transaction” as used in subdivision (f) shall have the same meaning as, and be determined according to the same standards as, specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 25102 and its implementing regulations provided that, solely with respect to this section, a lender or purchaser who is represented by counsel may designate that person as its professional adviser whether or not that person is compensated by the issuer or guarantor, as long as that person has a bona fide attorney-client relationship with the lender or purchaser.

(h) This section shall not exempt any
 person from the application of the California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 47.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Recapitalizations and Reorganizations [25120. - 25122.]

25120.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), it is unlawful for any person to offer or sell in this state any security in any of the following manners:

(1) In an issuer transaction in connection with any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities.

(2) In any exchange of securities by the issuer with its existing security holders exclusively.

(3) In any exchange in connection with any merger or consolidation or purchase of assets in consideration wholly or in part of the issuance of securities.

(4) In an entity conversion transaction.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a security if the security is qualified for sale under this chapter (and no order under Section 25140 or subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect with respect to the qualification) or if the security or transaction is exempted or not subject to qualification under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 25100) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 964, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25121.

The securities qualified for sale under this chapter shall be qualified by permit under this section. The application for the permit shall be signed and verified by the issuer and shall contain such information and be accompanied by such documents as shall be required by rule of the commissioner, in addition to the information specified in Section 25160 and the consent to service of process required by Section 25165. For this purpose, the commissioner may classify issuers and types of securities and transactions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25122.

Qualification of securities under this chapter becomes effective upon the commissioner issuing a permit authorizing the issuance of such securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Nonissuer Transactions [25130. - 25134.]

25130.

It is unlawful for any person to offer or sell any security in this state in any nonissuer transaction unless it is qualified for such sale under this chapter or under Section 25111 or 25113 of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25110) of this part (and no order under Section 25140 or subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect with respect to such qualification) or unless such security or transaction is exempted or not subject to qualification under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 25100) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25131.

(a) The securities to be offered or sold in a nonissuer transaction, which are not eligible for qualification under Section 25111, shall be qualified by notification under this section; provided however that securities offered in a nonissuer transaction pursuant to an exemption under Regulation A under the Securities Act of 1933 shall be qualified under Section 25113.

(b) The application for qualification by notification under this section shall be signed and verified by the person on whose behalf the offering is being made or by the issuer or by any broker-dealer and shall contain such information and be accompanied by such documents as shall be required by rule of the commissioner, in addition to the information specified in Section 25160 and the consent to service of process required by Section 25165. For this purpose, the commissioner may classify issuers and types of securities.

(c) If no stop order or order under subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect under this law, a qualification under this section automatically becomes effective (and the securities may be offered and sold in accordance with the terms of the application as amended) at 12 o’clock noon California time on the 10th business day after the filing of the application or the last amendment thereto or at such earlier time as the commissioner determines.

(d) Information may not be required under this section unless it is known to the person filing the application or to the persons on whose behalf the distribution is to be made, or can be furnished by them without unreasonable effort or expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1103.)
-------------------------------------------

25132.

Every qualification under this chapter and every qualification of a nonissuer transaction under Section 25111 is effective for 12 months from its effective date, except during the time a stop order under Section 25140 or an order under subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect. A qualification under this chapter may be withdrawn only in the discretion of the commissioner. The commissioner may by rule or order extend the effective period of any qualification under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25133.

It is unlawful for any person without the written consent of the commissioner to consummate the sale or transfer of any securities heretofore or hereafter placed in escrow pursuant to a condition ordered by the commissioner and that have not been released from escrow, or that are subject to a currently effective legend condition requiring such consent (except as permitted therein), or concerning which the commissioner has issued a written notice to the holders thereof pursuant to Section 25534 ordering the certificates evidencing the securities to be stamped or printed with a legend as provided in the section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 41, Sec. 5.   Effective May 6, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25134.

Every applicant seeking qualification for the sale of securities shall, upon request of the commissioner, furnish to the commissioner an authorization for examination of the applicant’s financial records of the sale of such securities pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1320.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Authority of the Commissioner [25140. - 25151.]

25140.

(a) (1) The commissioner may issue a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of, any qualification of an underwritten offering of securities under Section 25111, 25112 or 25131 or may suspend or revoke any permit issued under Section 25113 or 25122 if he or she finds (A) that the order is in the public interest and (B) that the proposed plan of business of the issuer or the proposed issuance or sale of securities is not fair, just, or equitable, or that the issuer does not intend to transact its business fairly and honestly, or that the securities proposed to be issued or the method to be used in issuing them will tend to work a fraud upon the purchaser thereof.

(2) In the case of an application for or qualification of securities under Section 25111, 25112, or 25131 that is not an underwritten offering of securities, the commissioner may issue a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of the qualification unless he or she finds (A) that the stop order is not in the public interest and (B) that the proposed plan of business of the applicant or the proposed issuance of securities is fair, just, and equitable, that the issuer intends to transact its business fairly and honestly, and that the securities that the issuer proposes to issue or the method to be used in issuing them are not such as will work a fraud upon the purchaser thereof.

(b) The commissioner may refuse to issue a permit under Section 25113 unless he or she finds that the proposed plan of business of the applicant and the proposed issuance of securities are fair, just, and equitable, that the applicant intends to transact its business fairly and honestly, and that the securities which it proposes to issue and the methods to be used by it in issuing them are not such as, in his or her opinion, will work a fraud upon the purchaser thereof.

(c) The commissioner may refuse to issue a permit under Section 25122 unless he or she finds that the proposed plan of recapitalization or reorganization and the proposed issuance of securities are fair, just, and equitable to all security holders affected.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, the commissioner shall not have authority to issue any stop order or to refuse to issue or to suspend or revoke any permit on the basis that the price at which the security is to be offered is unfair, unjust or inequitable in any case where the security is being publicly offered for cash pursuant to a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933 and the offering is the subject of a firm commitment underwriting by an underwriter or syndicate of underwriters all of whom are registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. For the purposes of this subdivision a firm commitment underwriting means an underwriting pursuant to which the underwriter or syndicate of underwriters is committed to take up and pay for the securities subject only to the usual or customary conditions, but not including any “market out” or similar condition operative after the time of commencement of the offering. (A condition relating to the suspension of all trading on a national securities exchange, a banking holiday, war, civil insurrection, or the like is not a “market out” or similar condition within the meaning of this subdivision.) Nothing contained in this subdivision shall deny authority to the commissioner to issue a stop order or to refuse to issue or to suspend or revoke a permit because of unreasonable discounts, commissions or other compensation to underwriters, sellers or others, unreasonable promoters’ profits or participations or unreasonable amounts or kinds of options.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1035, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25141.

The commissioner may impose as a condition of qualification under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25110) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25120) of this part conditions requiring the deposit in escrow of securities, imposing a legend condition restricting the transferability thereof, impounding the proceeds from the sale thereof, limiting the expense in connection with the sale thereof, requiring the waiver of assets, dividends or voting rights by the holders of promotional securities, or any other condition if the commissioner finds that without such condition the offering will be unfair, unjust or inequitable. The commissioner may in his or her discretion modify or remove any such conditions when in his or her opinion they are no longer necessary or appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 41, Sec. 6.   Effective May 6, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25142.

When application is made for a permit to issue securities or to deliver other consideration (whether or not the security or transaction is exempt from qualification or not required to be qualified) in exchange for one or more bona fide outstanding securities, claims, or property interests, or partly in such exchange and partly for cash, the commissioner is expressly authorized to approve the terms and conditions of such issuance and exchange or such delivery and exchange and the fairness of such terms and conditions, and is expressly authorized to hold a hearing upon the fairness of such terms and conditions, at which all persons to whom it is proposed to issue securities or to deliver such other consideration in such exchange have the right to appear. The application for a permit to deliver consideration other than securities shall be in such form, contain such information and be accompanied by such documents as shall be required by rule of the commissioner or, in the absence thereof, in substantially the form of an application filed pursuant to Section 25121.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

25143.

(a) The commissioner may by order summarily postpone or suspend the effectiveness of any qualification pending final determination of any proceeding under this chapter. Upon the entry of the order, the commissioner shall promptly notify each person specified in subdivision (b) of this section that it has been entered and of the reasons therefor and that upon the receipt of a written request the matter will be set down for hearing to commence within 15 business days after such receipt unless the applicant consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order will remain in effect until it is modified or vacated by the commissioner. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the commissioner, after notice and hearing in accordance with subdivision (b) of this section, may modify or vacate the order or extend it until final determination.

(b) No stop order may be entered under this chapter except under subdivision (a) of this section without appropriate prior notice to the applicant, the issuer, and the person on whose behalf the securities are to be or have been offered and hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, in connection with which the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted thereunder. In the case of qualification by permit, such hearing shall be held upon such notice within 20 business days after a written request therefor by the applicant unless the permit is issued prior to the expiration of such period or the applicant consents to a later date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

25144.

The commissioner may vacate or modify a stop order if he finds that the conditions which caused its entry have changed or that it is otherwise in the public interest to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25145.

Every issuer qualifying securities for sale in this state shall at all times keep and maintain a complete set of books, records, and accounts of such sales and the disposition of the proceeds thereof, and shall thereafter, at such times as are required by the commissioner, make and file in the office of the commissioner a report, setting forth the securities sold by it under such qualification, the proceeds derived therefrom and the disposition thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25146.

For a period of 18 months after the qualification is effective, the commissioner may by rule or order require an issuer who has filed an application to file reports not more often than semiannually for the purpose of keeping reasonably current the information contained in the application; provided, that the commissioner may not require the filing of any such report after completion of the offering if a nonissuer transaction in the security would be entitled to exemption under Section 25101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 598, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25147.

The commissioner may by rule or order require as a condition of qualification that any security qualified under Section 25113 be sold only on a specified form of subscription or sale contract, and that a signed or conformed copy of each contract be preserved for any period up to three years specified in the rule or order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25148.

Except in cases where the delivery of a prospectus or proxy statement is required under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the commissioner may by rule or order require as a condition of qualification under Section 25112, 25113, 25122 or 25131 that a prospectus or proxy statement containing any designated part of the information required in the application be given to each person to whom an offer is made before the sale of the security to be issued under the permit or order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 442, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25149.

The commissioner may act as escrow holder for securities required to be deposited in escrow by his order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25150.

The commissioner may accept and act upon the opinions, appraisements and reports of any engineers, appraisers, or other experts which may be presented by an applicant on any question of fact concerning or affecting the securities proposed to be offered and sold. In lieu of, or in addition to, such opinions, appraisements, and reports, the commissioner may have any or all matters concerning or affecting such securities investigated, appraised, passed upon and certified to him by engineers, appraisers, or other experts selected by him.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25151.

(a) Upon the filing of a written request for the consent to transfer securities referred to in Section 25133, accompanied by such information and documents as the commissioner may by rule require, the commissioner shall issue such consent if the commissioner finds that the transfer requested will be fair, just, and equitable to the proposed transferees, and otherwise the commissioner shall deny such consent.

(b) The issuance of the commissioner’s consent pursuant to this section shall not be a qualification of the transaction pursuant to, nor an exemption from the qualification requirements of, Section 25110, 25120, or 25130.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 577, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. General Provisions [25160. - 25166.]

25160.

Every application for qualification shall state (1) the maximum amount of securities proposed to be offered in this state; and (2) any adverse order, judgment, or decree entered in connection with the offering by the regulatory authority in any state or by any court or by the Securities and Exchange Commission. Verification of an application shall be in the manner provided in the Code of Civil Procedure for the verification of pleadings. All information required to be included in an application shall be true and complete as of the time the qualification of the sale of securities becomes effective; and an applicant shall promptly supply by amendment prior to the effectiveness of such qualification any information based on facts occurring after the original date of filing which is necessary to supplement or correct the information contained in the original application so as to make such information not materially misleading as of the effective date of such qualification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25161.

Any document filed under this law or a predecessor statute may be incorporated by reference in a subsequent application or notice filing if it was filed within four years prior to the filing of the application or notice filing, or is otherwise available in the files of the commissioner, to the extent that the document is currently accurate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25162.

An amendment to an application filed after the effective date of the qualification of the sale of securities, if such amendment is approved by the commissioner, shall become effective on such date as the commissioner may determine, having due regard to the public interest and the protection of investors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25163.

In any proceeding under this law, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25164.

(a) Neither (1) the fact that an application for qualification under this law has been filed nor (2) the fact that such qualification has become effective constitutes a finding by the commissioner that any document filed under this law is true, complete, or not misleading. Neither any such fact nor the fact that a notice is filed or an exemption is available for a security or a transaction means that the commissioner has passed in any way upon the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, any person, security or transaction (except as provided in Section 25142).

(b) It is unlawful to make or cause to be made to any prospective purchaser any representation inconsistent with subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) Every permit issued by the commissioner shall recite in bold type that the issuance thereof is permissive only and does not constitute a recommendation or endorsement of the securities permitted to be issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25165.
